Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.075

Retired status certificate.

The board may adopt rules under this section authorizing a retired status certificate. An individual certificated under this chapter who has reached the age of sixty-five years and has retired from the active practice of engineering and land surveying may, upon application and at the discretion of the board, be exempted from payment of annual renewal fees thereafter.

[ 1995 c 356 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 356: See note following RCW 18.43.020.